Hawaii statutes.
§269-110 Termination by eligible
customer-generators. If an eligible customer-generator terminates the
customer relationship with the electric utility, the electric utility shall
reconcile the eligible customer‑generator's consumption and production of
electricity, including any unused credits for excess electricity from the
eligible customer‑generator carried over from prior months, for the
period following the last twelve-month reconciliation period to the date of
termination of the relationship, according to the requirements set forth in
this part. [L 2001, c 272, pt of §6; am L 2005, c 104, §10]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next